Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.10.220

Jurisdiction of courts as to the department's enforcement orders—Venue.

(1) The director may apply to a superior court of Washington for the enforcement of any effective and outstanding final order issued pursuant to this chapter, and the superior court shall have jurisdiction to order compliance with such final order.

(2) No court shall have jurisdiction to affect by injunction or otherwise the department's issuance or enforcement of any order pursuant to this chapter, or to review, modify, suspend, terminate, or set aside such order, except as provided in this chapter.

(3) The venue for enforcement of a final order by the department under this chapter shall be the superior court in the county of the principal place of business of the person upon whom the order is imposed or, in the case of such person not being domiciled in Washington state, the venue shall be Thurston county superior court.

[ 2019 c 389 s 29.]